Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-267
County agricultural society; reinstatement authorized.

A county agricultural society operating or organized under the County Agricultural Society Act, which has become inoperative because of neglect in the discharge of its duties devolved upon it by law, or for any other reason, may at any time procure an extension, restoration, renewal, or revival of its corporate existence, together with all the rights, franchises, privileges, and immunities and subject to all of its duties, debts, and liabilities which had been secured or imposed by its original articles of incorporation and its amendments, by filing with the Secretary of State a certificate of its last acting president and secretary or treasurer, chairperson and other officers, or officers elected or appointed as provided in section 2-271.

Laws 1995, LB 671, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 2-241;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 18.